Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1408
Wrongful termination of employment or disciplinary action; reinstatement; action to enforce act.

An employee who is terminated or against whom any disciplinary action is taken in violation of the Volunteer Emergency Responders Job Protection Act shall be immediately reinstated to his or her former position, if wrongfully terminated, without reduction of wages, seniority, or other benefits and shall receive any lost wages or other benefits, if applicable, during any period for which such termination or other disciplinary action was in effect. An action to enforce the act may be brought by the employee to recover any lost wages or other benefits, including court costs and reasonable attorney's fees. An action to enforce the act shall be commenced within one year after the date of violation and shall be brought in the district court of the county in which the place of employment is located.

Laws 2008, LB1096, § 11.